Arkansas, session 2025, HB1599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-3-301(7), concerning property that is
exempt from tax, is amended to read as follows:
(7) All buildings belonging to institutions of purely public
charity, together with the land actually occupied by these institutions, not
leased or otherwise used with a view to profit, and all moneys and credits
appropriated solely to sustaining, and belonging exclusively to, these
institutions, and motor vehicles, as defined in § 26-52-103, that are subject
to a lease of at least twelve (12) months by an institution of public
charity;

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for
assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.






*JLL152*
02/25/2025 3:56:08 PM JLL152